Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.036

Salary and wage deductions for contributions to charitable agencies—Deduction and payment to United Fund or Washington state combined fund drive—Rules, procedures.

Any official of the state or of any of its political subdivisions authorized to disburse funds in payment of salaries or wages of public officers or employees is authorized, upon written request of the officer or employee, to deduct from the salary or wages of the officer or employee the amount of money designated by the officer or employee for payment to the United Fund or the Washington state combined fund drive.

The moneys so deducted shall be paid over promptly to the United Fund or the Washington state combined fund drive designated by the officer or employee. Subject to any rules adopted by the office of financial management, the official authorized to disburse the funds in payment of salaries or wages may prescribe any procedures necessary to carry out RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036.

[ 2002 c 61 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 28 s 2; 1979 c 151 s 53; 1973 c 106 s 16; 1957 c 208 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—1983 1st ex.s. c 28: See note following RCW 42.16.010.